Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1177XS (5) 91 jm/md S.F. 26 Section 1. Section 29C.9, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. For the purposes of this chapter , a commission is a 3 municipality as defined in section 670.1 and a municipality as 4 defined in section 24.2 . 5 Sec. 2. Section 29C.17, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 6 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 For purposes consistent with this chapter , the local 8 emergency management agencyâs approved budget shall be fully 9 funded by one or any combination of the following options, as 10 determined by the commission: 11 Sec. 3. Section 29C.17, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 6. Subject to As a certifying board under chapter 24 , the 14 commission shall adopt, certify, and provide a budget, on 15 or before February 28 of each year, to the funding entities 16 determined pursuant to subsection 2 . The form of the budget 17 shall be as prescribed by the department of management. Any 18 portion of a tax levied by a county or city to support the local 19 emergency management agency shall be identified separately on 20 tax statements issued by the county treasurer. 21 Sec. 4. Section 29C.17, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 22 following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. The budget adopted and certified by the 24 commission pursuant to subsection 6 shall not be amended or 25 changed by any other entity other than the commission. 26 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to budgets for 27 property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or 28 after July 1, 2026. 29